Ohio, session 136, SB380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 1.66 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 1.66. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Incompatible law" means any law, rule, or regulation of a jurisdiction outside any state or territory of the United States that does not provide the same or equivalent rights and liberties guaranteed under the United State Constitution, the Ohio Constitution, or the common law as recognized in this state. (2) "Religious law, custom, or practice" means any law, rule, or regulation of a religious system, belief, code, or ethnic or tribal custom or practice that is incompatible with the United State Constitution, Ohio Constitution, or the common law as recognized in this state. (3) "Government entity" means a state agency, public institution, political subdivision, or any other organized body, office, agency, institution, or entity established by the laws of this state for the exercise of any function of government. (B) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code, no government entity shall recognize or enforce any incompatible law or any religious law, custom, or practice that permits, enforces, or implements any of the following: (1) Prejudicial treatment of women or persons of a particular race, religion, ethnicity, social class, or caste; (2) Prohibition of the right to leave, change, or renounce one's religion or belief; (3) Prohibition of otherwise protected speech or assembly; (4) Plural marriages; (5) Marriages of convenience or contracts for sexual services; (6) Forced marriages or marriages that are otherwise unlawful under the laws of this state; (7) Violence against women and children, excluding reasonable parental discipline of children; (8) Politically or religiously motivated physical violence or homicide; (9) Cruel and unusual punishments as prohibited by the Eighth Amendment to the United States Constitution, including amputation, lashing, flogging, stoning, branding, or piercing; (10) Female genital mutilation; (11) Human sacrifice. Section 2. This act shall be known as An Act to Affirm and Ensure the Supremacy of the Constitutions of the United States of America and Ohio and the Foundational Principle of the American System of Government: Individual Liberty.